Washington statutes.
RCW 41.60.140

Incentive pay or awards not included in retirement calculations.

Incentive pay or awards provided under this chapter shall not be included for the purpose of computing a retirement allowance under any public retirement system of this state.

[ 1982 c 167 s 10.]

NOTES:

Severability—1982 c 167: See note following RCW 41.60.015.